Arkansas statutes. Title 10 General Assembly
Chapter 4 Legislative Audit
10-4-422. Records — Public inspection — Definitions.

The Legislative Auditor shall keep, or cause to be kept, a complete, accurate, and adequate set of fiscal transactions of Arkansas Legislative Audit.

The Legislative Auditor shall also keep paper, digital, or electronic copies of all audit reports, examinations, investigations, and any other reports or releases issued by the Legislative Auditor.

(1)All working papers, including communications, notes, memoranda, preliminary drafts of audit reports, and other data gathered in the preparation of audit reports by Arkansas Legislative Audit, are exempt from all provisions of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., and are not to be considered public documents for purposes of inspection or copying under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., or any other law of the State of Arkansas, except as provided in this subsection.

After any audit report has been presented to members of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, the audit report and copies of any documents contained in the working papers of Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be open to public inspection, except documents specifically exempted from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., unsubstantiated allegations obtained in complying with auditing standards or other professional guidelines regarding the detection of fraud, and documents which disclose auditing procedures and techniques as defined in subdivision (c)(3) of this section.

As used in this subsection:

“Audit program” means the instructions and guidelines formulated by Arkansas Legislative Audit to inform its accountants about the examination procedures to be followed in the course of examining records and accounts to verify their accuracy, including verifications that the examination procedures have been followed; and

“Documents which disclose auditing procedures and techniques” includes:

Internal control questionnaires consisting of the checklist of accounting and administrative procedures employed by Arkansas Legislative Audit in the course of performing an audit; and

An audit program.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 21.

10-4-423. Seal.

The Secretary of State shall procure an official seal for Arkansas Legislative Audit.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 22.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit.”

10-4-424. Audit of information systems operations.

Arkansas Legislative Audit may conduct audits of all or any part of the information systems or operations of any entity of the state or political subdivision of the state.

Charges incurred in the performance of information systems audits or audit-related tasks by Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be absorbed by the entity of the state or political subdivision of the state being audited.

However, the use shall not interfere with or impede normal information systems operations.

The information systems provider shall provide requested data or other information or services to Arkansas Legislative Audit within ten (10) days of the request, unless another date is agreed to by the Legislative Auditor.

The Division of Information Systems, its successor agency, or other entities of the state or political subdivisions of the state that provide internet, network, or other computer services or information to an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state shall provide access to all data, support, or other necessary information services to Arkansas Legislative Audit in connection with their functions at no cost to Arkansas Legislative Audit.

In connection with any audit by Arkansas Legislative Audit, contractual providers of information systems or other computer-related services to entities of the state or political subdivisions of the state shall cooperate and provide requested information at no cost to Arkansas Legislative Audit.

All contracts by entities of the state and political subdivisions of the state with vendors for information systems or other computer services shall contain a provision permitting Arkansas Legislative Audit access and authority to audit computer applications supplied by vendors.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “information systems” for “data processing” in the section heading; substituted “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “The Division of Legislative Audit” in (a) and for “the division” throughout the rest of the section; substituted “the information systems or operations” for “automated data processing operations or systems” in (a); in (b)(1)(A), substituted “Charges” for “Data processing charges,” inserted “information systems,” substituted “entity of the state” for “state agency,” and substituted “being audited” for “processing data for the computer application being accessed or audited”; substituted “information systems operations” for “processing by the data processing installation” in (b)(1)(B); and substituted “information systems” for “data processing” in (b)(2), (d), and (e).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “rules” in (b)(2).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (a), substituted the first occurrence of “Arkansas Legislative Audit” for “the Division of Legislative Audit” and the second occurrence for “the division.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “entity” for “Legislative Auditor” at the end of (b)(1); and substituted “Upon receipt of payment from the surety, the entity shall” for “The Legislative Auditor shall transmit the payments received to the treasurers of the respective local taxing units with instructions to” in (b)(2).

Publisher's Notes. This chapter, concerning the Commission on Interstate Cooperation, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 526, § 1. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

10-5-101. Acts 1951, No. 378, § 2; 1955, No. 164, § 1; 1957, No. 394, § 1; 1965, No. 374, § 1; 1983, No. 427, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-112.

10-5-102. Acts 1951, No. 378, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-113.

10-5-103. Acts 1951, No. 378, § 4; 1957, No. 394, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-114.

10-5-104. Acts 1951, No. 378, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-115.

10-5-105. Acts 1951, No. 378, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-116.

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1465, § 7. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

10-6-101. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-118.

10-6-102. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-119.

10-6-103. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-120.

10-6-104. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-121.

10-6-105. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-122.

10-6-106. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-123.

10-6-107. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-124; Acts 1999, No. 646, § 2.

10-6-108. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-125.

10-6-109. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-126.

10-6-110. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-128.

10-6-111. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-127.

10-6-112. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-129.

10-6-113. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-131.

10-6-114. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-130.

10-6-115. Acts 1961, No. 486, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 4-132.

The 1977 regular session of the General Assembly enacted a “sunset law” Acts 1977, No. 100, which provided for review, and possible termination, of numerous state agencies. This act was amended and supplemented by legislation in succeeding sessions through 1983. All continuations and terminations mandated by these acts are now complete and are reflected in this Code. The sunset laws are set out below for the convenience of users of this Code.

SECTION 1. INTENT. The General Assembly hereby determines that State Government actions have produced a substantial increase in the number of agencies, departments, boards, commissions, institutions, and programs of this State, growth of pre-existing programs, and the proliferation of rules and regulations, and that this whole process developed without sufficient legislative oversight, regulatory accountability, or a system of checks and balances. The General Assembly further determines that by establishing a system for the termination, study, review, continuation, or re-establishment of such agencies, it will be in a better position to evaluate the need for the continued existence of existing and future agencies, departments, boards, commissions, institutions, and programs of the State Government.

It is further the intention of the General Assembly to establish an orderly schedule for the termination of all existing State agencies, during a six-year period, but to make provision for legislative review by the Joint Interim Committees of the Arkansas General Assembly, including the holding of public hearings, to enable the General Assembly to have the benefit of recommendations for the continuation of those State agencies which are deemed to be essential for the necessary and efficient operation of Government, prior to the termination thereof.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS. As used in this Act, the term “State agency” or “State agencies” shall include and mean State agencies, departments, boards, commissions, institutions, councils, advisory committees, and programs and services of the State of Arkansas, to which specific reference is made in this Act.

SECTION 3. The following State agencies shall terminate on June 30, 1979:

the State Department of Education and the State Board of Education, created by Section 3 of Act 169 of 1931, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-102, which were transferred to the Department of Education under the provisions of Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-910;

the Arkansas Library Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 139 of 1935, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-301, as transferred to the Library Division of the Department of Education by Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-910, and the Library Division of the Department of Education, created by Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971;

the Arkansas School for the Blind, created by Section 1 of Act 64 of 1879, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2201;

the Arkansas School for the Deaf, created by Section 1 of Act 36 of 1868, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2301;

the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas School for the Blind and Arkansas School for the Deaf, created by Section 2 of Act 1 of 1943, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 7-201;

the Educational Television Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 198 of 1961, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3901, as transferred to the Educational Television Division of the Department of Education by Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-910, and the Educational Television Division of the Department of Education, created by Section 10 of Act 38 of 1971; and

the Board for Vocational Education, created by Section 187 of Act 169 of 1931, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-2514.

the State Advisory Council to the Employment Security Division of the Department of Labor, created by Section 11 of Act 391 of 1941, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1114;

the Elevator Safety Board, created by Section 2 of Act 189 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1802;

the Boiler Advisory Board, created by Section 2 of Act 494 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-502;

the Arkansas Employment Agency Advisory Council, created by Section 3 of Act 493 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1015;

the Boiler Inspection Division of the Department of Labor, created by Section 1 of Act 494 of 1961, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-501;

the State Kidney Disease Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 450 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2502;

the State Spinal Cord Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 311 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3302;

the Pollution Control Commission, created by Section 3 of Act 472 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1903, transferred to the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology by Section 8 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-908, and the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology created by Section 8 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-908.

the Environmental Preservation Division of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology, created by Section 8 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-908;

the Division of Water Pollution Control, the Division of Air Pollution Control, the Division of Solid Waste Management, the Division of Environmental Preservation, and the Division of Administration of the Pollution Control Commission, created by Section 2 of Part I of Act 472 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1903, and as transferred to the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology by Section 8 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-908;

the State Health Planning Council, created by Section 3 of Act 305 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2303, transferred to the Statewide Health Coordinating Council by Section 7 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3607; and the Statewide Health Coordinating Council, created by Section 7 of Act 558 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3607.

the Nursing Home Advisory Council, created by Section 8 of Act 58 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2208;

the Advisory Hospital Council, created by Section 8 of Act 414 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-334;

the Emergency Medical Services Advisory Council, created by Section 3 of Act 435 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-3403;

the Child Care Facility Review Board, created by Section 12 of Act 434 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-911;

the Arkansas Office on Drug Abuse Prevention of the Department of Social and Rehabilitative Services, created by Section 2 of Act 1000 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2124;

the Drug Abuse Authority, created by Section 2 of Act 1000 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2124; and

the Arkansas Drug Abuse Advisory Council, created by Section 6 of Act 1000 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-2128.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Economic and Industrial Resources and Development:

the Division of Soil and Water Resources of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Soil and Water Conservation Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 14 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-118, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the State Apiary Board, created by Section 1 of Act 59 of 1945, the same being Arkansas Statutes 78-1701, which was tranferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 87 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 78-301, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the State Plant Board, created by Section 3 of Act 414 of 1917, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 77-103, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Weights and Measures Division of the State Plant Board, created by Section 6 of Act 482 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 79-206, which was transferred to the Department of Commerce by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Livestock, Poultry, and Agriculture of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Division of Plants of the Department of Commerce, created by Section 16 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Department of Parks and Tourism, created by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the State Parks, Recreation and Travel Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 330 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-202, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-916;

the Stonewall Jackson Memorial Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 211 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3801, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Arkansas Territorial Capitol Restoration Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 388 of 1939, as amended the same being Arkansas Statutes 8-102, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907, and transferred to the Department of Arkansas Natural and Cultural Heritage by Section 4 of Act 1001 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-923;

the Poison Springs State Park, created by Section 1 of Act 182 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-635, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Publicity Division of the Arkansas Publicity and Parks Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 310 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 9-221, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Arkansas History Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 355 of 1911, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-201, which was transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the Monuments and Historical Sites Division of the Department of Parks and Tourism, created by Section 7 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-907;

the State Economic Development Study Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 193 of 1975;

the Mineral Resources Commission, authorized by House Concurrent Resolution 34 of 1973; and

the Arkansas Civil War Centennial Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 213 of 1959, the same being Arkansas Statutes 8-701.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Judiciary:

the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Police Division of the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Military Division of the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Law Enforcement Training Academy Division of the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Police Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 394 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-403;

the Enforcement Division of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission, created by Section 18 of Act 159 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 48-1317, which was transferred to the Department of Public Safety by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, formerly the Department of Alcohol Beverage Control, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the State Fire Marshal Enforcement Section of the Department of Public Safety, created by Section 21 of Act 1017 of 1975 (Ext. Sess. 1976), the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914.1;

the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy, created by Section 1 of Act 526 of 1963, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-701, which was transferred to the Department of Public Safety by Section 14 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-914;

the Department of Correction, created by Section 1 of Act 50 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 46-100;

the Board of Pardons and Paroles, created by Section 1 of Act 621 of 1969, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 43-2802;

the State Penitentiary Board, created by Section 1 of Act 208 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes (1964) 43-2801, as renamed the Board of Correction by Section 2 of Act 50 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 46-101;

the Workshop-Made Products Committee, created by Section 1 of Act 405 of 1973, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 14-229; and

the Board of Judicial Reapportionment, created by Section 2 of Act 325 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 22-310 note.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs:

the Office of Planning, created by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904;

the Veterans Service Office, created by Section 1 of Act 234 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 11-1401;

the State Building Services, created by Section 5 of Act 716 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-1022;

the War Memorial Stadium Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 249 of 1947, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-3401;

the State Capitol Grounds Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 507 of 1963, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-225;

the Capitol Zoning District Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 267 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-235;

the Claims Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 276 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 13-1401;

the Criminal Detention Facilities Board, created by Section 3 of Act 244 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 46-1202;

the Governor's Mansion Advisory Council, created by Section 6 of Act 400 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-318;

the Governor's Mansion Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 400 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-313;

the Arkansas Commission on Interstate Cooperation, created by Section 2 of Act 378 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 6-112;

the Executive Committee on Law Enforcement Standards, created by Section 6 of Act 452 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-1005;

the State Administration Department, created by Section 1 of Act 468 of 1967, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-801, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Criminal Justice and Highway Safety Information Center, created by Section 1 of Act 286 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-1101;

the Budget and Accounting Division; the Local Affairs and Audit Division; the Administrative Services Division; and the Purchasing Division of the State Administration Department, created by Section 3 of Act 468 of 1967, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-803, which were transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Surplus Property Program, created by Section 1 of Act 303 of 1945, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-732, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the State Printing Board, created by Section 2 of Act 544 of 1975, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 14-302;

the Department of Alcohol Beverage Control, created by Section 1 of Act 159 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 48-1301, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Board of Finance, created by Section 1 of Act 338 of 1955, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 13-401;

the Board of Directors of the Garland Levee District, created by Act 311 of 1913;

the Board of Directors of the Miller Levee District No. 2, created by Act 69 of 1911;

the Board of Directors of the Red River Levee District No. 1, created by Act 97 of 1905;

the Red River Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 264 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 21-1014;

the Department of Finance and Administration, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Personnel Division of the State Administration Department, created by Section 1 of Act 466 of 1967, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-810, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Office of Telecommunications, created by Section 2 of Act 47 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-824, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Office of Data Processing, created by Section 2 of Act 46 of 1968 (First Extraordinary Session), the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-820, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Older Worker Community Service Employment Program, created by Section 2 of Act 815 of 1975, the same being Arkansas Statutes 81-1502, which was transferred to the Department of Local Services by Section 4 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-904; and

the Merit Council, as referred to in Section 6 of Act 280 of 1939, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 83-107.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Revenue and Taxation:

the Arkansas Racing Commission, created by Section 2 of Act 46 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-2728, which was transferred to the Division of Racing of the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Racing Division of the Department of Finance and Administration, created by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905;

the Tax Revision Commission, created by Section 1 of Act 726 of 1975; and

the Office of Commissioner of Revenues, created by Section 2 of Act 88 of 1925, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-1701, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905.

The following State agencies, to be terminated on June 30, 1979, shall be reviewed by the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs:

the Arkansas Highway Retirement System, created by Section 2 of Act 454 of 1949, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 76-1902;

the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, created by Section 16 of Act 93 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 80-1436;

the State Police Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 311 of 1951, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 42-451;

the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, created by Section 2 of Act 365 of 1953, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 22-902;

the Arkansas Quasi-Judicial Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 148 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2701;

the State Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

the County Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

the Municipal Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 4 of Act 177 of 1957, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2504;

the Non-Teacher Public School Employees Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 63 of 1965, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2542;

the General Assembly Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 202 of 1961, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2510.2;

the Retired Constitutional Officers Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 6 of Act 103 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2511.2;

the County Elected Constitutional Officers Division of the Public Employees Retirement System, created by Section 1 of Act 581 of 1973, the same being Arkansas Statutes 12-2511.5;

the Arkansas Retirement Systems Study Committee, created by Section 1 of Act 293 of 1975;

the Tax Division and the Assessment Coordination Division of the Public Service Commission, which were created by Section 1 of Act 245 of 1959, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-114; and

the Department of Revenues created by Section 2 of Act 88 of 1925, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 84-1701, which was transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by Section 5 of Act 38 of 1971, as amended, the same being Arkansas Statutes 5-905.

SECTION 4. The following State agencies shall terminate on June 30, 1981;

the Wastewater Plant Operators Licensing Committee, created by Section 2 of Act 211 of 1971, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-1984;

the Board of Pharmacy, created by Section 2 of Act 50 of 1891, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1002;

the Board of Optometry, created by Section 2 of Act 94 of 1941, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-802;

the Inhalation Therapy Examination Committee, created by Section 3 of Act 168 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1603;

the Board of Hearing Aid Dispensers, created by Section 1 of Act 197 of 1969, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1701;

the Board of Healing Arts, created by Section 3 of Act 187 of 1959, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-123;

the Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors, created by Section 1 of Act 412 of 1957, the same being Arkansas Statutes 71-901;

the Board of Dental Examiners, created by Section 2 of Act 14 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-535;

the Board of Chiropractor Examiners, created by Section 1 of Act 26 of 1915, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-401;

the Coal Mine Examining Board, created by Section 1 of Act 486 of 1919, the same being Arkansas Statutes 52-501;

the Cemetery Board, created by Section 4 of Act 250 of 1953, the same being Arkansas Statutes 82-414;

the State Medical Board, created by Section 2 of Act 65 of 1955, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-602; and

the Board of Physical Therapy, created by Section 3 of Act 141 of 1959, the same being Arkansas Statutes 72-1319.

SECTION 5. The following State agencies shall terminate on June 30, 1983:

SECTION 6. Any State agency scheduled for termination under the provisions of this Act may be continued or re-established by the General Assembly by the adoption of a law providing for the re-establishment thereof.

SECTION 7. The Division of Legislative Audit shall cause to be conducted a performance audit of each State agency and the respective divisions and programs thereof, which are scheduled for termination under this Act. The performance audit shall be completed at least three (3) months prior to the time established by this Act for the termination of the State agency. In conducting the audit, the Division of Legislative Audit shall take into consideration, but shall not be limited to, the factors listed in Section 8 of this Act. Upon completion of the audit report, the Division of Legislative Audit shall present copies thereof to the members of the appropriate Joint Interim Committee which has the State agency under review, and shall make itself available to such Committee for the purpose of reviewing the audit report.

If the Joint Interim Committees to which State agencies are referred for review under the provisions of this Act shall specifically request in writing a report from the Governor containing his recommendations for continuation, abolition, or modification of each of the State agencies and the divisions and programs thereof, which are under consideration by the Joint Interim Committees, failure by the Governor to file such a report with the Committees shall not prohibit the Committees from proceeding with their duties under this Act.

SECTION 8. Prior to termination, continuation, or re-establishment of any State agency, the Joint Interim Committee which is assigned the responsibility for reviewing such State Agency and the various divisions and programs thereof, shall hold one or more public hearings and receive testimony from the public and the Executive Director or administrative head of the State Agency, including such division directors or other employees thereof as the Committee may deem appropriate, and in such a hearing the State agency shall have the burden of demonstrating a public need for its continued existence and shall cooperate with the Committee in determining such changes, modifications, or revisions in the role, duties, and purposes of the agency which might promote the efficiency of the administration or operation of the agency, if continued.

In such hearings, the determination made by the respective Joint Interim Committee as to whether a State agency assigned to it for review has demonstrated a public need for its continued existence, shall take into consideration the following factors, among others:

SECTION 9. (a) In the event an agency shall cease to exist pursuant to this Act, the laws governing its powers, duties, and functions are not repealed, but shall be administered by some other State agency, if so designated by the General Assembly, unless the General Assembly specifically repealed the laws establishing such powers, duties, and functions.

SECTION 10. This act shall not cause the dismissal of claims of the public or individuals against any State agency, or any claim or right of a State agency terminated pursuant to this Act which is subject to litigation.

SECTION 11. Each of the respective Joint Interim Committees of the General Assembly assigned the responsibility for reviewing State agencies which are scheduled to terminate on or before June 30 of the year in which the regular session of the General Assembly convenes, shall conclude their studies and file recommendations with the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs, on or before September 1 of the year preceding the convening of the next regular session of the General Assembly, containing the recommendations of the Committee with respect to those State agencies which, in the opinion of the Committee should be continued. Such recommendations shall be one of the following: 1) that the State agency be continued; 2) that the State agency be continued, but that its duties be revised or it be consolidated with some other agency; or 3) that the State agency be terminated by law. Provided, that if the Committee does not make a recommendation with respect to a State agency, such action shall be construed as a recommendation that the State agency terminate. In the event the Joint Interim Committee shall recommend that the State agency be continued, but that its duties be revised or that it be consolidated with some other State agency, the report of the Committee shall specifically outline recommendations on consolidation recommended by the Committee.

Upon receipt of the reports of the respective Joint Interim Committees, the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall consolidate all such reports and shall review the same and hold additional hearings, if the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs determines the same is necessary, to enable said Committee to file a consolidated report with the next regular session of the General Assembly outlining the findings and recommendations of the respective Joint Interim Committees, including such additional recommendations that the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall deem appropriate. The consolidated report of the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall be filed with the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and each member of the House of Representatives and Senate, the Governor, and the Secretary of State.

SECTION 12. The Bureau of Legislative Research of the Arkansas Legislative Council shall provide staff, secretarial, and technical assistance to the Joint Interim Committees in making the studies and reviews of the respective State agencies scheduled for termination under the provisions of this Act.

APPROVED: February 3, 1977.

SECTION 1. That Section 7 of Act 100 of 1977 is hereby amended to read as follows:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2201, § 7; 2015, No. 554, § 23; 2019, No. 910, § 6065.